Utah statutes.
53B-17-301.   Unclaimed dead bodies -- Notice to School of Medicine --
Preservation of dead bodies.
(1)  Any person who has charge over an unclaimed dead body that is to be
buried at public expense shall notify the dean of the School of Medicine at
the University of Utah within 24 hours after taking charge of the body.
(2)  The notice shall specify the probable cause of death.
(3)  At the dean's request, the person shall forward the body to the
university, at its expense, within 24 hours of receiving the dean's request.
(4)  The delivered body shall be properly embalmed and preserved for not less
than 60 days.  If a personal friend or relative of the deceased person
requests the body for a private burial, during this time period, the person is
given possession of the body.
